District of Columbia statutes.
1-623.39

Student-employees.

A student-employee, as defined by § 5351 of Title 5 of the United States Code , who suffers disability or death as a result of personal injury arising out of and in the course of training, or incurred in the performance of duties in connection with that training, is considered for the purpose of this subchapter an employee who incurred the injury in the performance of duty.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2339, 25 DCR 5740

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-624.39.
1973 Ed., § 1-353.39.